Wisconsin, session 2025, AB599.
do enact as follows:AB599,11Section 1. 5.02 (24d) of the statutes is created to read:AB599,2,525.02 (24d) “Statewide voter registration system” means the election 3administration software application provided by the commission to enable local 4election officials to register electors, track absentee voting, and administer 5elections.AB599,26Section 2. 6.18 (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB599,3,376.18 Former residents. (intro.) If ineligible to qualify as an elector in the 8state to which the elector has moved, any former qualified Wisconsin elector may 9vote an absentee ballot in the ward of the elector’s prior residence in any 10presidential election occurring within 24 months after leaving Wisconsin by 11requesting an application form and returning it, properly executed, to the 12municipal clerk of the elector’s prior Wisconsin residence. When requesting an 13application form for an absentee ballot, the applicant shall specify the applicant’s 14eligibility for only the presidential ballot. Unless the applicant is exempted from 15providing proof of identification under s. 6.87 (4) (b) 2. or 3., or the applicant is a 16military or overseas elector, the elector shall enclose a copy of his or her proof of 17identification or any authorized substitute document with his or her application. 18The municipal clerk shall verify that the name on the proof of identification 19conforms to the name on the application. The clerk shall not issue a ballot to an 20elector who is required to enclose a copy of proof of identification or an authorized 1substitute document with his or her application unless the copy is enclosed and the 2proof is verified by the clerk. The application form shall require the following 3information and be in substantially the following form:AB599,34Section 3. 6.86 (1) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB599,3,656.86 (1) (a) 3. By signing a statement and filing a request to receive absentee 6ballots under sub. (2) or (2m) (a) or s. 6.22 (4), 6.24 (4), or 6.25 (1) (c).AB599,47Section 4. 6.86 (1) (ac) of the statutes is amended to read:AB599,3,1786.86 (1) (ac) Any elector qualifying under par. (a) may make written 9application to the municipal clerk for an official ballot by means of facsimile 10transmission or electronic mail. Any application under this paragraph need not 11contain a copy of the applicant’s original signature. An elector requesting a ballot 12under this paragraph shall return with the voted ballot a copy of the request 13bearing an original signature of the elector as provided in s. 6.87 (4). Except as 14authorized in ss. 6.87 (4) (b) 2. 3. to 5. and 6.875 (6), and notwithstanding s. 343.43 15(1) (f), the elector shall transmit a copy of his or her proof of identification in the 16manner provided in s. 6.87 (1) unless the elector is a military elector or an overseas 17elector or the elector has a confidential listing under s. 6.47 (2).AB599,518Section 5. 6.86 (1) (ad) of the statutes is created to read:AB599,4,2196.86 (1) (ad) 1. If a municipal clerk receives proof of identification under par. 20(ac) from an elector who files a request to receive absentee ballots under sub. (2m) 21(a), the municipal clerk shall retain an electronic copy of the proof of identification 22in the statewide voter registration system until the elector is no longer receiving 23absentee ballots under sub. (2m) (a) or until the proof of identification has expired. 24If the elector’s proof of identification has expired, the municipal clerk shall notify 1the elector that the elector needs to submit a valid proof of identification in order to 2continue automatically receiving ballots under sub. (2m) (a).AB599,4,1532. An authorized disability advocate may assist an elector with a disability in 4transmitting a copy of the elector’s proof of identification to the municipal clerk for 5purposes of filing a request to receive absentee ballots under sub. (2m) (a). An 6authorized disability advocate shall maintain a record of all electors who received 7assistance from the advocate under this subdivision for each election and provide 8that record to the municipal clerk no later than the Friday immediately following 9election day. The record shall include the name of the elector, the name of the 10advocate, and the date on which the elector received assistance under this 11subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision, “authorized disability advocate” 12means an employee of a disability rights organization that is described in section 13501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is exempt from federal income tax 14under section 501 (a) of the Internal Revenue Code or a caregiver, as defined in s. 1550.065 (1) (ag).AB599,616Section 6. 6.86 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB599,5,16176.86 (1) (b) Except as provided in this section, if application is made by mail, 18the application shall be received no later than 5 p.m. on the 5th day immediately 19preceding the election. If application is made in person, the application shall be 20made no earlier than 14 days preceding the election and no later than the Sunday 21preceding the election. No application may be received on a legal holiday. A 22municipality shall specify the hours in the notice under s. 10.01 (2) (e). The 23municipal clerk or an election official shall witness the certificate for any in-person 24absentee ballot cast. Except as provided in par. (c), if the elector is making written 1application for an absentee ballot at the partisan primary, the general election, the 2presidential preference primary, or a special election for national office, and the 3application indicates that the elector is a military elector, as defined in s. 6.34 (1), 4the application shall be received by the municipal clerk no later than 5 p.m. on 5election day. If the application indicates that the reason for requesting an absentee 6ballot is that the elector is a sequestered juror, the application shall be received no 7later than 5 p.m. on election day. If the application is received after 5 p.m. on the 8Friday immediately preceding the election, the municipal clerk or the clerk’s agent 9shall immediately take the ballot to the court in which the elector is serving as a 10juror and deposit it with the judge. The judge shall recess court, as soon as 11convenient, and give the elector the ballot. The judge shall then witness the voting 12procedure as provided in s. 6.87 and shall deliver the ballot to the clerk or agent of 13the clerk who shall deliver it to the polling place or, in municipalities where 14absentee ballots are canvassed under s. 7.52, to the municipal clerk as required in s. 156.88. If application is made under sub. (2) or (2m), the application may be received 16no later than 5 p.m. on the Friday immediately preceding the election.AB599,717Section 7. 6.86 (2) of the statutes is repealed.AB599,818Section 8. 6.86 (2m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB599,6,22196.86 (2m) (a) Except as provided in this subsection, any elector other than an 20elector who receives an absentee ballot under sub. (2) or s. 6.22 (4) or 6.24 (4) (c) 21may by written application filed with the municipal clerk of the municipality where 22the elector resides require that an absentee ballot be sent to the elector 23automatically for every election that is held within the same calendar year in which 24the application is filed. The application form and instructions shall be prescribed 1by the commission, and furnished upon request to any elector by each municipal 2clerk. The municipal clerk shall thereupon mail an absentee ballot to the elector for 3all elections that are held in the municipality during the same calendar year that 4the application is filed, except that the clerk shall not send an absentee ballot for an 5election if the elector’s name appeared on the registration list in eligible status for a 6previous election following the date of the application but no longer appears on the 7list in eligible status. The municipal clerk shall ensure that any envelope 8containing the absentee ballot is clearly marked as not forwardable. If an elector 9who files an application under this subsection no longer resides at the same address 10that is indicated on the application form, or no longer wishes to automatically 11receive absentee ballots under this paragraph, the elector shall so notify the 12municipal clerk, in writing. The municipal clerk shall discontinue mailing absentee 13ballots to an elector under this subsection upon receipt of reliable information that 14the elector no longer qualifies as an elector of the municipality. In addition, the 15municipal clerk shall discontinue mailing absentee ballots to an elector under this 16subsection if the elector fails to return any absentee ballot mailed to the elector. 17The municipal clerk shall notify the elector of any such action not taken at the 18elector’s request within 5 days, if possible. An elector who fails to cast an absentee 19ballot but who remains qualified to receive absentee ballots under this subsection 20may then receive absentee ballots for subsequent elections by notifying the 21municipal clerk that the elector wishes to continue receiving absentee ballots for 22subsequent elections.AB599,923Section 9. 6.86 (2m) (a) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 24(this act), is amended to read:AB599,8,216.86 (2m) (a) Except as provided in this subsection, any elector other than an 2elector who receives an absentee ballot under sub. (2) or s. 6.22 (4) or 6.24 (4) (c) 3may by written application filed with the municipal clerk of the municipality where 4the elector resides require that an absentee ballot be sent to the elector 5automatically for every election. The application form and instructions shall be 6prescribed by the commission, and furnished upon request to any elector by each 7municipal clerk. The municipal clerk shall thereupon mail an absentee ballot to the 8elector for all elections that are held in the municipality, except that the clerk shall 9not send an absentee ballot for an election if the elector’s name appeared on the 10registration list in eligible status for a previous election following the date of the 11application but no longer appears on the list in eligible status. The municipal clerk 12shall ensure that any envelope containing the absentee ballot is clearly marked as 13not forwardable. If an elector who files an application under this subsection no 14longer resides at the same address that is indicated on the application form, or no 15longer wishes to automatically receive absentee ballots under this paragraph, the 16elector shall so notify the municipal clerk, in writing. The municipal clerk shall 17discontinue mailing absentee ballots to an elector under this subsection upon 18receipt of reliable information that the elector no longer qualifies as an elector of the 19municipality. In addition, the municipal clerk shall discontinue mailing absentee 20ballots to an elector under this subsection if the elector fails to return any absentee 21ballot mailed to the elector. The municipal clerk shall notify the elector of any such 22action not taken at the elector’s request within 5 days, if possible. An elector who 23fails to cast an absentee ballot but who remains qualified to receive absentee ballots 24under this subsection may then receive absentee ballots for subsequent elections by 1notifying the municipal clerk that the elector wishes to continue receiving absentee 2ballots for subsequent elections.AB599,103Section 10. 6.87 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB599,8,1546.87 (1) Upon proper request made within the period prescribed in s. 6.86, the 5municipal clerk or a deputy clerk authorized by the municipal clerk shall write on 6the official ballot, in the space for official endorsement, the clerk’s initials and 7official title. Unless application is made in person under s. 6.86 (1) (ar), the absent 8elector is exempted from providing proof of identification under sub. (4) (b) 2. or 3., 9or the applicant is a military or overseas elector, the absent elector shall enclose a 10copy of his or her proof of identification or any authorized substitute document with 11his or her application. The municipal clerk shall verify that the name on the proof 12of identification conforms to the name on the application. The clerk shall not issue 13an absentee ballot to an elector who is required to enclose a copy of proof of 14identification or an authorized substitute document with his or her application 15unless the copy is enclosed and the proof is verified by the clerk.AB599,1116Section 11. 6.87 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB599,9,5176.87 (2) (intro.) Except as authorized under sub. (3) (d), the municipal clerk 18shall place the ballot in an unsealed envelope furnished by the clerk. The envelope 19shall have the name, official title and post-office address of the clerk upon its face. 20The other side of the envelope shall have a printed certificate which shall include a 21space for the municipal clerk or deputy clerk to enter his or her initials indicating 22that if the absentee elector voted in person under s. 6.86 (1) (ar), the elector 23presented proof of identification to the clerk and the clerk verified the proof 24presented. The certificate shall also include a space for the municipal clerk or 1deputy clerk to enter his or her initials indicating that the elector is exempt from 2providing proof of identification because the individual is a military elector or an 3overseas elector who does not qualify as a resident of this state under s. 6.10 or is 4exempted from providing proof of identification under sub. (4) (b) 2. or 3. The 5certificate shall be in substantially the following form:AB599,126Section 12. 6.87 (4) (b) 2. of the statutes is repealed.AB599,137Section 13. 6.875 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB599,9,2486.875 (3) (a) An occupant of a qualified retirement home or residential care 9facility who qualifies as an absent elector and desires to receive an absentee ballot 10shall make application under s. 6.86 (1), (2), or (2m) with the municipal clerk or 11board of election commissioners of the municipality in which the elector is a 12resident. Except as provided in sub. (4) (ar), the clerk or board of election 13commissioners of a municipality receiving an application from an elector who is an 14occupant of a qualified retirement home or residential care facility located in a 15different municipality shall, as soon as possible, notify and send an absentee ballot 16for the elector to the clerk or board of election commissioners of the municipality in 17which the home or facility is located. Except as provided in sub. (4) (ar), the clerk or 18board of election commissioners of a municipality receiving an application from an 19elector who is an occupant of a qualified retirement home or residential care facility 20located in the municipality but who is a resident of a different municipality shall, as 21soon as possible, notify and request an absentee ballot from the clerk or board of 22election commissioners of the municipality in which the elector is a resident. The 23clerk or board of election commissioners shall make a record of all absentee ballots 24to be sent, delivered, and voted under this section.AB599,141Section 14. 6.875 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB599,10,1726.875 (4) (a) For the purpose of absentee voting in qualified retirement homes 3and residential care facilities, the municipal clerk or board of election 4commissioners of each municipality in which one or more qualified retirement 5homes or residential care facilities are located shall appoint at least 2 special voting 6deputies for the municipality. Except as provided in par. (am), upon application 7under s. 6.86 (1), (2), or (2m) by one or more qualified electors who are occupants of 8a home or facility, the municipal clerk or board of election commissioners of the 9municipality in which the home or facility is located shall dispatch 2 special voting 10deputies to visit the home or facility for the purpose of supervising absentee voting 11procedure by occupants of the home or facility. The clerk or board of election 12commissioners shall maintain a list, available to the public upon request, of each 13home or facility where special voting deputies are dispatched. The list shall include 14the date and time the deputies intend to visit each home or facility. The 2 deputies 15designated to visit each qualified retirement home and residential care facility 16shall be affiliated with different political parties whenever deputies representing 17different parties are available.AB599,1518Section 15. 7.08 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB599,10,23197.08 (1) (c) Prescribe forms required by ss. 6.24 (3) and (4), 6.30 (4) and (5), 206.33 (1), 6.47 (1) (am) 2. and (3), 6.55 (2), and 6.86 (2) to (2m) and (3). All such forms 21shall contain a statement of the penalty applicable to false or fraudulent 22registration or voting through use of the form. Forms are not required to be 23furnished by the commission.AB599,1624Section 16. 7.15 (1) (j) of the statutes is amended to read:AB599,11,417.15 (1) (j) Send an absentee ballot automatically to each elector and send or 2transmit an absentee ballot to each military elector, as defined in s. 6.34 (1), and 3each overseas elector making an authorized request therefor in accordance with s. 46.22 (4), 6.24 (4), or 6.86 (2) or (2m).AB599,175Section 17. 12.13 (6) of the statutes is created to read:AB599,11,8612.13 (6) Authorized disability advocates. No person in his or capacity as 7an authorized disability advocate under s. 6.86 (1) (ad) 2. may knowingly transmit 8to the municipal clerk a fraudulent proof of identification under s. 6.86 (1) (ad) 2.AB599,189Section 18. 12.60 (1) (e) of the statutes is created to read:AB599,11,101012.60 (1) (e) Whoever violates s. 12.13 (6) is guilty of a Class I felony.AB599,1911Section 19. Nonstatutory provisions.AB599,11,2012(1) As soon as practicable after the effective date of this subsection, each 13municipal clerk shall notify all electors who are automatically receiving absentee 14ballots as indefinitely confined electors under s. 6.86 (2) that they will not be able to 15receive ballots under s. 6.86 (2) beginning on the effective date of this subsection but 16may automatically receive absentee ballots under s. 6.86 (2m) (a) if they submit 17valid proof of identification to the municipal clerk before January 1, 2029. A 18municipal clerk who receives valid proof of identification from an elector under this 19subsection shall consider receipt of that proof of identification to be an application 20to automatically receive absentee ballots under s. 6.86 (2m) (a).AB599,2021Section 20. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 22publication, except as follows:AB599,12,223(1) The repeal of ss. 6.86 (2) and 6.87 (4) (b) 2. and the amendment of ss. 6.18 24(intro.), 6.86 (1) (a) 3., (ac), and (b) and (2m) (a) (by Section 9), 6.87 (1) and (2) 1(intro.), 6.875 (3) (a) and (4) (a), 7.08 (1) (c), and 7.15 (1) (j) take effect on January 1, 22029.AB599,12,33